Wisconsin, session 2025, AB37.
do enact as follows:AB37,11Section 1. 341.145 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB37,2,182341.145 (3) In addition to the regular application fee provided under s. 341.25 3(1) (a), (c) or (j) or (2) or 341.26 (3) (a) 2. or (am), the applicant for a personalized 4registration plate issued on an annual basis shall pay a fee of $15 for the issuance of 5the plate and $15 in each succeeding year to maintain the plate. In addition to the 6regular application fee provided under s. 341.25 (1) (b) or 341.26 (3) (a) 1., the 7applicant for a personalized registration plate issued on a biennial basis shall pay a 8fee of $30 for issuance of the plate if the plate is issued during the first year of the 9biennial registration period or $15 for issuance of the plate if the plate is issued 10during the 2nd year of the biennial registration period. The fee to maintain a 11personalized plate issued on a biennial basis is $30. The fee for reissuance of a 12personalized plate shall be $15 for an annual registration and $30 for a biennial 13registration. An No fee may be charged to an applicant for personalized plates 14issued under sub. (1) (b) or (c) shall not be required to pay the fee (1g) (a) or (b) for 15initial issuance of the plates. No fee may be charged to a member of a special group 16specified under s. 341.14 (6r) (f) 19m. for maintenance or reissuance of plates issued 17under sub. (1g) (b) displaying the applicable symbol of the special group specified 18under s. 341.14 (6r) (f) 19m.AB37,219Section 2. Effective date.AB37,3,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 2publication.AB37,3,33